North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 2. County Director of Social Services.

§ 108A-12.
Appointment.

The board of social services of every county shall appoint a director of social services in accordance with the merit system rules of the North Carolina Human Resources Commission. Any director dismissed by such board shall have the right of appeal under the same rules.

Two or more boards of social services may jointly employ a director of social services to serve the appointing boards and such boards may also combine any other functions or activities as authorized by Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A. The boards shall agree on the portion of the director’s salary and the portion of expenses for other joint functions and activities that each participating county shall pay.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, ss. 3, 4; C.S., s. 5016; 1921, c. 128; 1929, c. 291, s. 1; 1931, c. 423; 1937, c. 319, s. 5; 1941, c. 270, s. 4; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Commission” for “State Personnel Commission” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

§ 108A-13.
Salary.

The board of social services of every county, with the approval of the board of county commissioners, shall determine the salary of the director in accordance with the classification plan of the North Carolina Human Resources Commission, and such salary shall be paid by the county from the federal, State and county funds available for this purpose.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, ss. 3, 4; C.S., s. 5016; 1921, c. 128; 1929, c. 291, s. 1; 1931, c. 423; 1937, c. 319, s. 5; 1941, c. 270, s. 4; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Commission” for “State Personnel Commission.”

§ 108A-14.
Duties and responsibilities. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The director of social services shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To serve as executive officer of the board of social services and act as its secretary;

To appoint necessary personnel of the county department of social services in accordance with the merit system rules of the North Carolina Human Resources Commission;

To administer the programs of public assistance and social services established by this Chapter under pertinent rules and regulations;

To administer funds provided by the board of commissioners for the care of indigent persons in the county under policies approved by the county board of social services;

To act as agent of the Social Services Commission and Department of Health and Human Services in relation to work required by the Social Services Commission and Department of Health and Human Services in the county;

To investigate cases for adoption and to supervise adoptive placements;

To issue employment certificates to children under the regulations of the State Department of Labor;

To supervise adult care homes under the rules and regulations of the Medical Care Commission;

To assist and cooperate with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and their representatives;

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-13, s. 7, effective April 17, 2003, and applicable to all petitions for sterilization pending and orders authorizing sterilization that have not been executed as of April 17, 2003.

To assess reports of child abuse and neglect and to take appropriate action to protect such children pursuant to the Child Abuse Reporting Law, Article 3 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes;

To accept children for placement in foster homes and to supervise placements for so long as such children require foster home care;

To respond by investigation to notification of a proposed adoptive placement pursuant to G.S. 48-3(b) and (c); and

To receive and evaluate reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults and to take appropriate action as required by the Protection of the Abused, Neglected, or Exploited Disabled Adults Act, Article 6 of this Chapter, to protect these adults.

To receive and evaluate reports of financial exploitation of disabled adults, to investigate credible reports of financial exploitation under Article 6A of this Chapter, and to take appropriate action to protect these adults.

The director may delegate to one or more members of his staff the authority to act as his representative. The director may limit the delegated authority of his representative to specific tasks or areas of expertise. The director may designate, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Labor, additional personnel outside his staff to issue youth employment certificates.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5017; 1941, c. 270, s. 5; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 710, s. 5; 1973, c. 476, ss. 133.3, 138; c. 1262, s. 109; c. 1339, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 8; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1983, c. 293; 1985, c. 203, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 258, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 31; 1995, c. 214, s. 2; c. 535, s. 4; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 13(v); 2003-13, s. 7; 2005-55, s. 12; 2005-276, s. 10.42; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2013-337, s. 3; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2017-186, s. 2(vvvv).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 108A-14

.

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to subdivision (a)(9) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(jjj), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-55, s. 12, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “assess” for “investigate” in subdivision (a)(11).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.42, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Medical Care” for “Social Services” in subdivision (a)(8).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in subdivision (a)(9).

Session Laws 2013-337, s. 3, effective December 1, 2013, added subdivision (a)(15).

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Commission” for “State Personnel Commission” in subdivision (a)(2).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(vvvv), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in subdivision (a)(9).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(jjj), in subdivision (a)(9), substituted “Department” for “Division”, and inserted “the Division of” and “respective”. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108A-14.
Duties and responsibilities. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The director of social services shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To serve as executive officer of the board of social services and act as its secretary;

To appoint necessary personnel of the county department of social services in accordance with the merit system rules of the North Carolina Human Resources Commission;

To administer the programs of public assistance and social services established by this Chapter under pertinent rules and regulations;

To administer funds provided by the board of commissioners for the care of indigent persons in the county under policies approved by the county board of social services;

To act as agent of the Social Services Commission and Department of Health and Human Services in relation to work required by the Social Services Commission and Department of Health and Human Services in the county;

To investigate cases for adoption and to supervise adoptive placements;

To issue employment certificates to children under the regulations of the State Department of Labor;

To supervise adult care homes under the rules and regulations of the Medical Care Commission;

To assist and cooperate with the Department of Adult Correction and the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and their respective representatives;

Repealed by Session Laws 2003-13, s. 7, effective April 17, 2003, and applicable to all petitions for sterilization pending and orders authorizing sterilization that have not been executed as of April 17, 2003.

To assess reports of child abuse and neglect and to take appropriate action to protect such children pursuant to the Child Abuse Reporting Law, Article 3 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes;

To accept children for placement in foster homes and to supervise placements for so long as such children require foster home care;

To respond by investigation to notification of a proposed adoptive placement pursuant to G.S. 48-3(b) and (c); and

To receive and evaluate reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of disabled adults and to take appropriate action as required by the Protection of the Abused, Neglected, or Exploited Disabled Adults Act, Article 6 of this Chapter, to protect these adults.

To receive and evaluate reports of financial exploitation of disabled adults, to investigate credible reports of financial exploitation under Article 6A of this Chapter, and to take appropriate action to protect these adults.

The director may delegate to one or more members of his staff the authority to act as his representative. The director may limit the delegated authority of his representative to specific tasks or areas of expertise. The director may designate, subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Labor, additional personnel outside his staff to issue youth employment certificates.

History.

1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, s. 3; C.S., s. 5017; 1941, c. 270, s. 5; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; 1961, c. 186; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1971, c. 710, s. 5; 1973, c. 476, ss. 133.3, 138; c. 1262, s. 109; c. 1339, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 8; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1983, c. 293; 1985, c. 203, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 258, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 31; 1995, c. 214, s. 2; c. 535, s. 4; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 13(v); 2003-13, s. 7; 2005-55, s. 12; 2005-276, s. 10.42; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2013-337, s. 3; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2017-186, s. 2(vvvv); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(jjj).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 108A-14

.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the main volume.

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to subdivision (a)(9) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(jjj), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-55, s. 12, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “assess” for “investigate” in subdivision (a)(11).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.42, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “Medical Care” for “Social Services” in subdivision (a)(8).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in subdivision (a)(9).

Session Laws 2013-337, s. 3, effective December 1, 2013, added subdivision (a)(15).

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Commission” for “State Personnel Commission” in subdivision (a)(2).

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(vvvv), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in subdivision (a)(9).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(jjj), in subdivision (a)(9), substituted “Department” for “Division”, and inserted “the Division of” and “respective”. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108A-15.
Social services officials and employees as public guardians.

The director and assistant directors of social services of each county may serve as guardians for adults adjudicated incompetent under the provisions of Chapter 35A, and they shall do so if ordered to serve in that capacity by the clerk of superior court having jurisdiction of a guardianship proceeding brought under either Article.

History.

1977, c. 725, s. 6; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1985, c. 361, s. 3; 1987, c. 550, s. 23.